Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-744
Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in sections 42-736 to 42-743 if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 44;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 42.

A party seeking to modify a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in Nebraska in accordance with the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act if the order has not been previously registered. Lamb v. Lamb, 14 Neb. App. 337, 707 N.W.2d 423 (2005).